bagval_numbers.lexd
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# MAIN PATTERNS
PATTERNS
# regular numbers
#
rootOne[norm] agrFinal[-Hpl,-Npl]
singles
decimal # аца
centi # бешен
DaSuffixedNums
#
#forms with links
#
decimal decComp # ацал, link in 11-19
rootDec conjDec # ац, link in 21-29
centi conjCentMil  
milli conjCentMil # links in 101-199, 10001-1999
#
#nominalized cardinal numbers
#
singles DatExceptions[-OblPlRu,-OblPlDu] # negSuffix[pst]?
DaSuffixedNums DatExceptions[-OblPlRu,-OblPlDu] # negSuffix[pst]?
NomNumbersAgr CasesGenAgr # negSuffix[pst]?
NomNumbersNonAgr CasesGenNonAgr # negSuffix[pst]?
#
#collective numbers
#
singles col 
decimal col 
DaSuffixedNums col
#
#ordinal numbers
#
rootOne[ord]
OrdNumbersSer1 agrFinal
OrdNumbersSer2
#
#nominalized ordinals
#
OrdNumbersSer1 agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom] # negSuffix[pst]?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjAgr CasesGenAgr # negSuffix[pst]?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjNonAgr CasesGenNonAgr # negSuffix[pst]?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjDative # negSuffix[pst]?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjSup # negSuffix[pst]?
#
#distributional numbers
#
rootOne[red] agrFinal # цецеб = 1
rootCent centDist cent end[DaNumber]
rootCent milDist mil end[DaNumber]?
decDist dec ( end[DaNumber] | end[RaNumber] ) # гьабдигьабда = 10
2xRootInit[excl] # 2
2xRootInit[-excl,DaNumber] end[DaNumber]
2xRootInit[-excl,RaNumber] end[RaNumber]
2xRootDec dec
#
#adjective agreement
#
agrInitial adjDouble agrFinal # can agree with 2 heads, see Kibrik et al.
adjSingle agrFinal
#
#nominalized adjectives
#double
agrInitial[Msg] adjDouble agrFinal[Msg] AddCasesMsg
agrInitial[Fsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Fsg] AddCasesFNsg
agrInitial[Nsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Nsg] AddCasesFNsg
agrInitial[Hpl] adjDouble agrFinal[Hpl] AddCasesHpl
agrInitial[Npl] adjDouble agrFinal[Npl] AddCasesNpl
agrInitial[Msg] adjDouble agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr
agrInitial[Fsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr 
agrInitial[Nsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr
agrInitial[Hpl] adjDouble agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] CasesGenAgr 
agrInitial[Npl] adjDouble agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr 
#single
adjSingle agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom]
adjSingle OblAdjAgr CasesGenAgr
adjSingle OblAdjNonAgr CasesGenNonAgr
adjSingle OblAdjDative # negSuffix[pst]?
#
#personal pronouns
#
PerPronounStems genitiveCase[GenAgr] # negSuffix[pst]?
PerPronounStems[PrExc] CaseMain[ErgR,-RegErg,-nullNom] # negSuffix[pst]?
PerPronounStems[-PrExc] CaseMain[ErgR] # negSuffix[pst]?
PerPronounExc # negSuffix[pst]?
PerPronounStems locMain directCase
#
#demonstrative pronouns
#
DemPronoun agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom]
# vocab plurals
DemPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblSingular[OblU] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[-GenAgr] ) # o-r-u , see vocab, 580
DemPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblSingular[OblU] locMain directCase
DemPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[GenAgr] ) # o-ba-lu- , see vocab, 580
DemPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] locMain directCase
# Kibrik plurals
DemPronoun OblAdjPlural[OblPlRu] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[GenAgr] )
DemPronoun ( DatExceptions[OblPlRu] | SupExceptions[OblPlRu] )
DemPronoun OblAdjPlural[OblPlRi] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[-GenAgr] )
DemPronoun ( OblAdjPlural[OblPlRu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlRi] ) locMain directCase
# F / N sg
DemPronoun ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[-GenAgr] )
DemPronoun LiFusion
DemPronoun ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) locMain directCase
# M sg
DemPronoun OblAdjSingular[OblSu] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[GenAgr] )
DemPronoun ( DatExceptions[OblSu] | SupExceptions[OblSu] )
DemPronoun OblAdjSingular[OblSu] locMain directCase
#
#logophoric pronouns + reflexive pronouns, see Kibrik et al. 162-163
#
LogPronoun[nom] agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom] RefSuffix?
# F / N sg
LogPronoun[obl] ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) CasesGenNonAgr RefSuffix?
LogPronoun[obl] LiFusion RefSuffix?
# M sg
LogPronoun[obl] OblAdjSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr RefSuffix?
LogPronoun[obl] ( DatExceptions[OblSu] | SupExceptions[OblSu] ) RefSuffix?
# plurals
LogPronoun[obl] OblAdjPlural[OblPlDu] CasesGenAgr RefSuffix?
LogPronoun[obl] ( DatExceptions[OblPlDu] | SupExceptions[OblPlDu] ) RefSuffix?
LogPronoun[obl] OblAdjPlural[OblPlDiri] CasesGenNonAgr RefSuffix?
#
#interrogative & negative pronouns
#
InterPronounExc PronModifiers? # nominative, see Kibrik et al, 164 & vocab, 580
InterPronoun[H] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers?
InterPronoun[H] DatExcMin[pron] PronModifiers?
InterPronoun[N] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers?
#which pronoun
WhichPronoun ( agrInitial[Msg] | ( agrInitial[Fsg] | agrInitial[Nsg] ) ) WhichInfix[sg] CaseMain[nullNom] PronModifiers?
WhichPronoun ( agrInitial[Hpl] | agrInitial[Npl] ) WhichInfix[pl] CaseMain[nullNom] PronModifiers?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Msg] WhichInfix[sg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Fsg] WhichInfix[sg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Nsg] WhichInfix[sg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Hpl] WhichInfix[pl] OblPlural[OblPlU] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Npl] WhichInfix[pl] OblPlural[OblPlU] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Msg] WhichInfix[sg] ( DatExcMin[-OblPlLu,-OblPlAlu,-pron] | ( SupExcMin[-OblPlLu,-OblPlAlu] directCase ) )
#number interrogative
NumPronoun CaseMain[nullNom] PronModifiers?
NumPronoun OblAdjSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers?
NumPronoun ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers?
NumPronoun OblPlural[OblPlAlu] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers?
NumPronoun ( DatExceptions[OblSu] | ( DatExceptions[OblFLi] | DatExceptions[OblNLi] ) ) PronModifiers?
NumPronoun ( SupExceptions[OblSu] | ( SupExceptions[OblFLi] | SupExceptions[OblNLi] ) ) PronModifiers?
NumPronounExc[sup] directCase
NumPronounExc[-sup]
#"Each" pronoun
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] EachPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] AddCasesMsg
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] EachPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] AddCasesFNsg
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] EachPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] AddCasesFNsg
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] EachPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] EachPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] EachPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr
#Interrogative adjective pronoun
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Msg] AddCasesMsg
InterAdjPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) AddCasesFNsg
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr
InterAdjPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] AddCasesHpl
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Npl] AddCasesNpl 
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] CasesGenAgr
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr
#indef pronoun ser. #2
InterPronounExc[Hsg] CaseMain[nullNom] ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] )
InterPronounExc[Nsg] CaseMain[nullNom] AltIndefPronounSuffix[Nsg]
InterPronounExc[Hsg] CaseMain[nullNom] AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl]
InterPronounExc[Npl] CaseMain[nullNom] AltIndefPronounSuffix[Npl]
InterPronoun[H] CasesGenAgr ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl] | ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] ) )
InterPronoun[H] DatExcMin[pron] ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl] | ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] ) )
InterPronoun[H] SupExcMin[pron] directCase ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl] | ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] ) )
InterPronoun[N] OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] CasesGenNonAgr AltIndefPronounSuffix[Nsg]
InterPronoun[N] ( DatExcMin[OblLi] | ( SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase ) ) AltIndefPronounSuffix[Nsg]
InterPronoun[N] OblAdjPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr AltIndefPronounSuffix[Npl]
InterPronoun[N] ( DatExcMin[OblLi] | ( SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase ) ) AltIndefPronounSuffix[Npl]
#anypronoun
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Msg] AddCasesMsg
AnyPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) AddCasesFNsg
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr
AnyPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] AddCasesHpl
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Npl] AddCasesNpl 
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] CasesGenAgr
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr
#allpronoun
agrInitial[Msg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] AddCasesMsg DaPostfix
agrInitial[Fsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] AddCasesFNsg DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] AddCasesFNsg DaPostfix
agrInitial[Hpl] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Hpl] AddCasesHpl DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Npl] AddCasesNpl DaPostfix
agrInitial[Msg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Fsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Hpl] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Hpl] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr DaPostfix
#universal ser. #3, see Kibrik et al. 166
InterPronounExc[Hsg] IndefPronounSuffix ( AddCasesMsg | AddCasesFNsg )
InterPronounExc[Hsg] IndefPronounSuffix OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr
InterPronounExc[Hsg] IndefPronounSuffix OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr 
InterPronounExc[Nsg] IndefPronounSuffix ( OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr | AddCasesFNsg )
InterPronounExc[Npl] IndefPronounSuffix ( OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr | AddCasesNpl )
#Misc. pronouns
HowPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )?
WhenPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )?
NumPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )?
LocPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )?
InterAdjPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )?

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# LEXICON ENTRIES
#
# COMMON MARKERS
#
LEXICON negSuffix
<neg>:чӀи[pst]
<neg>:чӀе[fut]

# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NUMBER DERIVATION
# 
LEXICON end
<num>:да[DaNumber]
<num>:ра[RaNumber]

LEXICON col
<col>:ла

# number modifiers
# 
LEXICON ordinal
<ord>:лъо[ser1]
<ord>:ла[ser2]

LEXICON ordinalOpt
:ла

LEXICON dec
<*>гьацӀа<num><ten>:ацӀа

LEXICON conjDec
<*>гьацӀа<num><ten>:ацӀ # 21-29

LEXICON cent
<*>бешенда<num><hundred>:бешен

LEXICON mil
<*>азарда<num><thousand>:азар

# distributional number modifiers
#
LEXICON decDist
цев<num><distr>:гьацӀигь

LEXICON centDist
<distr>:беши

LEXICON milDist
<distr>:ази

# number links
# 
LEXICON decComp
<lnk>:л # 11-19

LEXICON conjCentMil
<lnk>:чӀекӀуб

# --------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NOMINAL INFLECTION
# Oblique stem markers
#
LEXICON OblSingular
<obl>:[OblZero]
<obl>:а[OblA]
<obl>:и[OblI]
<obl>:е[OblE]
<obl>:у[OblU]
<obl>:щу[OblSu]
<obl>:лу[OblLu]
<obl>:лъи[OblLi]

LEXICON OblPlural
<obl>:а[OblPlA]
<obl>:алу[OblPlAlu]
<obl>:лу[OblPlLu]
<obl>:лъи[OblPlLi]
<obl>:у[OblPlU]

LEXICON OblAdjSingular
<M><sg><obl>:щу[OblSu]
<F><sg><obl>:лъи[OblFLi]
<N><sg><obl>:лъи[OblNLi]

LEXICON OblAdjPlural
<H><pl><obl>:лу[OblPlLu]
<H><pl><obl>:алу[OblPlAlu]
<N><pl><obl>:лъи[OblPlLi]
<H><pl><obl>:ру[OblPlRu]
<N><pl><obl>:ри[OblPlRi]
<H><pl><obl>:ду[OblPlDu]
<N><pl><obl>:дири[OblPlDiri]

# Noun plural suffixes
#
LEXICON PlAbs
<nom>:и

LEXICON PlMain
<pl>:{б}[PlBi]
<pl>:дар[PlDari]
